Hawaii statutes.
§334-125 Notice. (a) Notice of
the hearing shall be:

(1) Served personally on the subject of the petition pursuant
to family court rules;

(2) Served personally or by certified or registered
mail, return receipt requested, deliverable to the addressee only, to as many
as are known to the petitioner of the subject's spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary, legal parents, adult children, and legal guardian, if one has been
appointed;

(3) Served on the public defender, attorney for the
subject of the petition, or other court-appointed attorney as applicable; and

(4) Given to such other persons as the court may
designate.

(b) The notice shall include the following:

(1) The date, time, place of hearing, a clear
statement of the purpose of the proceedings and possible consequences to the
subject, and a statement of the legal standard upon which assisted community
treatment is being considered;

(2) A copy of the petition;

(3) Notice that the subject of the petition is
entitled to the assistance of an attorney, and that the public defender has
been notified of these proceedings; and

(4) Notice that if the subject does not want to be
represented by the public defender, the subject may contact the subject's own
attorney.

(c) Notice of all subsequent hearings shall be
served in accordance with subsections (a) and (b), and in accordance with all
applicable family court rules relating to service of notice, including that
service need not be made on parties in default for failure to appear. [L 1984,
c 251, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §48; am L 2013, c 221, §§11, 24; am L 2015,
c 231, §3; am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Rules of Court

Service of process, see HFCR rule 4.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next